District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.79

POWER — No creation of an entitlement.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create any entitlement to POWER benefits or to confer on any person or family any entitlement to POWER benefits.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 579
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905
See notes to § 4-205.69.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
1981 Ed., § 3-205.79.